Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1405
Attorney General; attorney for board;
fees and expenses.

The Attorney General shall render to the
Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board opinions on all questions
of law relating
to the interpretation of the Motor
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act or arising in the administration
thereof. The Attorney General shall
act as attorney for the board in all actions and proceedings brought by or
against it under or pursuant to any of the provisions of the act. All fees and expenses
of the Attorney General for
such duties shall be paid out of the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry
Licensing Fund.

Laws 1957, c. 280, § 5, p. 1016;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 58.